Utah statutes.
68-3-1.   Common law adopted.

The common law of England so far as it is not repugnant to, or in conflict  with, the constitution or laws of the United States, or the constitution or laws of this state, and so far only as it is consistent with and adapted to the natural and physical conditions of this state and the necessities of the people hereof, is hereby adopted, and shall be the rule of decision in all courts of this state.

